Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.23, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.23. A. The dismissal, suspension and
nonreemployment provisions of the Teacher Due Process Act of 1990
shall not apply to:
1. Substitute teachers;
2. Adult education teachers; and
3. Teachers who are employed on temporary contracts.
B. The dismissal and suspension provisions of the Teacher Due
Process Act of 1990 shall apply to teachers who are employed on
temporary contracts for a complete school year and to teachers who
are employed in positions fully funded by federal or private
categorical grants, except that such teachers shall be employed only
for the duration of the temporary contract or the grant.

C. The evaluation provisions in Sections 6-101.10 and 6-101.11
of this title and in the Teacher Due Process Act of 1990 shall apply
to teachers who are employed on temporary contracts for a complete
school year and to teachers who are employed in positions fully
funded by federal or private categorical grants, except that such
teachers shall be employed only for the duration of the temporary
contract or the grant.
D. Teachers other than those specifically excepted in
subsection A of this section who are employed on contracts shall be
afforded all substantive and procedural rights set forth in the
Teacher Due Process Act of 1990 including the dismissal, suspension,
and nonreemployment provisions applicable to probationary or career
teachers as defined in Section 6-101.3 of this title.
E. On and after the effective date of this act July 1, 1999,
any teacher who has worked a complete school year under a temporary
contract in a school district shall be granted a year of service
credit toward career status in that district.
F. No teacher shall be hired on a temporary contract by a
school district for more than four semesters or on multiple
temporary contracts by a school district that together are for more
than four semesters, except for a:
1. Teacher hired to replace a teacher who is on an approved
leave of absence and who is expected to return to employment with
the school district; or
2. Teacher who is a retired member of the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma; or
3. Teacher who is employed by a school district on an emergency
or provisional certificate.
G. No teacher shall be offered a temporary contract with a
school district without a full written disclosure at the time a
position is offered by the administration of the school district
which sets forth the terms and conditions of the temporary contract.
In the event the school district fails to provide such written
disclosure, the teacher shall be considered as employed on a
continuing contract basis.
H. On and after the effective date of this act July 1, 1999, no
teacher who is employed on a continuing contract basis by a school
ENR. H. B. NO. 1485 Page 2

district shall be reemployed on a temporary contract in that school
district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1485 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1485 Page 4